Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.061

Management of permanent funds in accordance with established standards.

Any investments made hereunder by the state investment board shall be made in accordance with the standards established in RCW 43.33A.140.

[ 1998 c 14 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 104 s 6.]